Washington statutes.
RCW 7.40.140

Disposition of money collected on enjoined judgment.

Money collected upon a judgment afterward enjoined, remaining in the hands of the collecting officer, shall be paid to the clerk of the court granting the injunction, subject to the order of the court.

[Code 1881 s 165; 1877 p 34 s 165; 1869 p 40 s 163; 1854 p 154 s 123; RRS s 731.]